Utah statutes.
16-10a-124.   Correcting filed documents.

(1)  A domestic or foreign corporation may correct a document filed with the division if the document:

(a)  contains an incorrect statement; or

(b)  was defectively executed, attested, sealed, verified, or acknowledged.

(2)  A document is corrected by delivering to the division for filing articles of correction that:

(a)  describe the document, including its filing date, or have a copy of it attached to the articles of correction;

(b)  specify the incorrect statement and the reason it is incorrect or the manner in which the execution, attestation, sealing, verification, or acknowledgement was defective; and

(c)  correct the incorrect statement or defective execution, attestation, sealing, verification, or acknowledgement.

(3)  Articles of correction may be executed by any person designated in Section 16-10a-120(6), or by any person who executed the document that is corrected.

(4)  Articles of correction are effective on the effective date of the document they correct except as to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction.  As to those persons, articles of correction are effective when filed.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

